inc/flattened/otw.lexc
LEXICON PT
aa:aa    PT_TAG    " 1 well; let's!, come on!;  2 oh!, well!" ; !Rand key:n7291535717n
aakaa:aakaa    PT_TAG    " 1 of all (the) places, of all things" ; !Rand key:n72973060059n
aanshge:aanshige    PT_TAG    " 1 go ahead [and do something]!" ; !Rand key:n72973451580n
bna:bina    PT_TAG    " 1 Look!" ; !Rand key:n72977243698n
dewe:dewe    PT_TAG    " 1 [sense missing]" ; !Rand key:n73101884541n
ehenh:ehenh    PT_TAG    " 1 yes" ; !Rand key:n73015754722n
gewe:gewe    PT_TAG    " 1 and, also, as well" ; !Rand key:n73019738423n
gsha:gosha    PT_TAG    " 1 (strong expression of impatience);  2 (indicating strong affirmation)" ; !Rand key:n73030510232n
kaa:kaa    PT_TAG    " 1 no" ; !Rand key:n73028443562n
kogaan:ikogaan    PT_TAG    " 1 Get lost! Go away!" ; !Rand key:n71428979127n
manj:amanj    PT_TAG    " 1 [see minj]" ; !Rand key:n7309023029n
minj:aminj    PT_TAG    " 1 however it may be, whenever, wonder how, wonder when" ; !Rand key:n71429344450n
mninaak:mVv1ninaak    PT_TAG    " 1 No way! any way, not that bad, not to that extreme" ; !Rand key:n72915857809n
na:na    PT_TAG    " 1 {particle marking yes/no questions}" ; !Rand key:n71430657090n
naa:naa    PT_TAG    " 1 emphatic;  2 eh? (as in Canadian English, inviting assent)" ; !Rand key:n71430657300n
naash:naash    PT_TAG    " 1 [see nnaash]" ; !Rand key:n73098533572n
nangna:nangVo1na    PT_TAG    " 1 Oh! [in sudden realization]" ; !Rand key:n73033613590n
nangna:nangona    PT_TAG    " 1 Oh! [in sudden realization]" ; !Rand key:n73033613590n
nji:onji    PT_TAG    " 1 because of, on account of, why;  2 from [a certain point in time or space]" ; !Rand key:n71433040244n
nmanj:namanj    PT_TAG    " 1 however it may be, whatever, whenever, I don't know [how], I wonder [how], I wonder [when]" ; !Rand key:n71433644056n
nnaash:ninaash    PT_TAG    " 1 (exp of impatience about something awaited)" ; !Rand key:n73098533637n
se:se    PT_TAG    " 1 Yuck!" ; !Rand key:n730313833n
shwii:shwii    PT_TAG    " 1 but, though" ; !Rand key:n73071454021n
was:awas    PT_TAG    " 1 Scat! Shoo! Go away!" ; !Rand key:n7303279059n
!these end immediately because they are too short to undergo apocope, and so can't pick up protective w
sa+Ipc:sa    #    " 1 so, so then, well" ; !Rand key:n73031277207n
go+Ipc:gVo1    #    " 1 indeed;  2 it's up to (with personal pronoun), it depends on (with personal pronoun)" ; !Rand key:n2010123111-11-13n
go+Ipc:go    #    " 1 indeed;  2 it's up to (with personal pronoun), it depends on (with personal pronoun)" ; !Rand key:n2010123111-11-13n
gwa+Ipc:gwa    #    " 1 [see go]" ; !Rand key:n2010123111-11-47n

LEXICON PT_TAG
+Ipc:0 CLOSED_PROTECTION ;

LEXICON CLOSED_PROTECTION !closed class words have deletable right-edge material that must not delete
0:w # ;
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Ottawa language describe things.

!LEXICON Adjectives
!adjective    Comparisons   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Ottawa language are bound to beginning of other words.

!LEXICON Prefixes
!nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2020 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Punctuation symbols

LEXICON Punctuation   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains the list
!! of punctuation symbols:
!! * Symbols like .,: are tagged with __+CLB__
!! * other symbols like +.& are tagged with __+PUNCT__, and
!! * paired symbols like ()«» are tagged with __+PUNCT+LEFT__
!!   and __+PUNCT+RIGHT__, respectively.

!! The punctuation symbols are listed in the following groups:

!! * Clause boundary symbols:
   ,       CLBcontlex        ;
   .       CLBcontlex        ;
  ..       CLBcontlex        ;
 ...       CLBcontlex        ;
  %:       CLBcontlex        ;
  %;       CLBcontlex        ;
  %!       CLBcontlex        ;
   |       CLBcontlex        ;
   ?       CLBcontlex        ; ! Question mark
   …       CLBcontlex        ;
   …:....  CLBerrorthcontlex ; ! Four and five full stops are analysed as
   …:..... CLBerrorthcontlex ; ! misspellings of the ellipsis sign.
   ¿       CLBcontlex        ; ! Only seen as noise.
   ¶       CLBcontlex        ; ! This sign is for titles, it is introduced by
                               ! the catxml script, and may be changed if it
                               ! interferes with real pilcrow signs.
   ❡       CLBcontlex        ; ! This sign is for titles on html pages, added
                               ! when jorgal apertium download pages for MT
   ¬       CLBcontlex        ;
   ¥       CLBcontlex        ; ! foreløpig
!! * Single punctuation marks
   •      PunctCont ;
   ●      PunctCont ;
   ·      PunctCont ;
   ּ       PunctCont ; ! HEBREW POINT DAGESH OR MAPIQ
   ·      PunctCont ;
   -:∑-   PunctCont ; ! hyphen
  --:∑-∑- PunctCont ; ! double hyphen
   –      PunctCont ; ! endash
   —      PunctCont ; ! emdash
   ―      PunctCont ; ! horizontal bar
   −      PunctCont ;
   _      PunctCont ;
   =      PunctCont ;
   ≈      PunctCont ;
   &      PunctCont ;
  %"      PunctCont ;
   '      PunctCont ;
   *      PunctCont ;
   +      PunctCont ;
   ±      PunctCont ;
   `      PunctCont ;
   ´      PunctCont ;
   /      PunctCont ;
   \      PunctCont ;
 +/-:+/∑- PunctCont ;
   ~      PunctCont ;
   ‐      PunctCont ;
   °      PunctCont ;
   ＂      PunctCont ;
!! * Paired punctuation marks
       (        PunctLeft ;
       )        PunctRght ;
       [        PunctLeft ;
       ]        PunctRght ;
       {        PunctLeft ;
       }        PunctRght ;
      %<:%[%<%] PunctLeft ;
      %>:%[%>%] PunctRght ;
       «:«7     PunctLeft ;
       »:»7     PunctRght ;
       ‹        PunctLeft ;
       ›        PunctRght ;
       “        PunctLeft ;
       ”        PunctRght ;
       „        PunctLeft ;
       ‟        PunctLeft ;
       ‘        PunctLeft ;
       ’        PunctRght ;
       ‚        PunctLeft ;
       ‛        PunctLeft ;
       ❛        PunctLeft ;
       ❜        PunctRght ;
       ❝        PunctLeft ;
       ❞        PunctRght ;
       ❟        PunctLeft ;
       ❠        PunctLeft ;
       ❮        PunctLeft ;
       ❯        PunctRght ;
       〝        PunctLeft ;
       〞        PunctRght ;
       〟        PunctLeft ;


! Todo: Some symbols from non-ISO code pages do not work

! +PUNCT:"\150" PunctEnd  ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
! +PUNCT:"\151" PunctEnd  ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
! Did not work.

LEXICON CLBcontlex
 +CLB: PunctEnd ;

LEXICON CLBerrorthcontlex
 +CLB+Err/Orth: PunctEnd ;

LEXICON PunctCont
 +PUNCT: PunctEnd ;

LEXICON PunctLeft
 +PUNCT+LEFT: PunctEnd ;

LEXICON PunctRght
 +PUNCT+RIGHT: PunctEnd ;

LEXICON NM
bezhig:bezhig    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 one;  2 a certain individual... (often used when making first reference to individuals in narration)" ; !Rand key:n7297662289n
mdaaching:midaaching    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 ten times" ; !Rand key:n71429457847n
mdaasing:midaasing    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 ten times" ; !Rand key:n71429469698n
mdaaswaak:midaaswaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 one thousand, ten hundred, thousand" ; !Rand key:n71429470161n
mdaaswi:midaaswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 ten" ; !Rand key:n71429470431n
mnik-dshing:minik-dashing    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 number of times" ; !Rand key:n71430158675n
naanan:naanan    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 five" ; !Rand key:n71431057896n
naanin:naanin    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 five" ; !Rand key:n71431060501n
naaning:naaning    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 five times" ; !Rand key:n71431060530n
naanmidna:naanimidana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 fifty" ; !Rand key:n71431060924n
naanwaak:naanwaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 five hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431062767n
ngo-bkwaakninch:ningo-bikwaakVv1ninj    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 one fistful, one handful" ; !Rand key:n73098742879n
ngo-dba'gaans:ningo-dibahigaans    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 one inch;  2 one hour;  3 one minute" ; !Rand key:n71431647234n
ngodwaak:ningodwaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 one hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431654764n
ngodwaasmidna:ningodwaasVv1midana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 sixty" ; !Rand key:n71431654926n
ngodwaaswaak:ningodwaaswaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 six hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431656264n
ngodwaaswi:ningodwaaswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 six" ; !Rand key:n71431656374n
niimdana:niimidana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 forty" ; !Rand key:n71431757054n
niish:niizh    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 two" ; !Rand key:n71431844474n
niishtana:niishtana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 twenty" ; !Rand key:n71431844497n
niiwaak:niiwaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 four hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431842786n
niiwin:niiwin    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 four" ; !Rand key:n71431843754n
niiwing:niiwing    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 four times" ; !Rand key:n71431843781n
niizhing:niizhing    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 twice, two times" ; !Rand key:n71431845065n
niizhwaak:niizhwaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 two hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431849517n
niizhwaasmidna:niizhwaasVv1midana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 seventy" ; !Rand key:n71431849639n
niizhwaaswaak:niizhwaaswaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 seven hundred" ; !Rand key:n71431850068n
niizhwaaswi:niizhwaaswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 seven" ; !Rand key:n71431850131n
nshwaasmidna:nishwaasVv1midana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 eighty" ; !Rand key:n71434553008n
nshwaaswaak:nishwaaswaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 eight hundred" ; !Rand key:n71434553640n
nshwaaswi:nishwaaswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 eight" ; !Rand key:n71434553714n
nsimdana:nisimidana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 thirty" ; !Rand key:n71434557020n
nsing:nising    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 three times" ; !Rand key:n71434557145n
nsoozit:nisoozid    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 three feet [long or high]" ; !Rand key:n71434671576n
nswaak:niswaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 three hundred" ; !Rand key:n71435058978n
nswi:niswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 three" ; !Rand key:n71435059259n
zhaangching:zhaangaching    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 nine times" ; !Rand key:n73072583118n
zhaangsimdana:zhaangasimidana    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 ninety" ; !Rand key:n73033448206n
zhaangswaak:zhaangaswaak    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 nine hundred" ; !Rand key:n73033448817n
zhaangswi:zhaangaswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 nine" ; !Rand key:n73033448914n
ngo-dba'aabaan:ningo-dibahaabaan    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 one mile" ; !Rand key:n20106517-36-31n
eko-niizhing:eko-niizhing    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 the second time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-1-23n
eko-nsing:eko-nising    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 the third time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-2-54n
eko-niiwing:eko-niiwing    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 the fourth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-6-33n
neniizh:neniizh    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 two by two;  2 two each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-23-28n
nenswi:neniswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 three by three;  2 three each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-25-28n
neniiwin:neniiwin    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 four by four;  2 four each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-36-6n
nen'godwaaswi:neningVo1dwaaswi    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 six by six;  2 six each" ; !Rand key:n201132915-39-31n
eko-naaning:eko-naaning    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 the fifth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-43-9n
eko-niizhwaaching:eko-niizhwaaching    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 the seventh time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-47-35n
eko-zhaangching:eko-zhaangaching    CLOSED_PROTECTION    " 1 the ninth time" ; !Rand key:n201132915-49-28n
